Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Net Metering of Electricity

278.465.
Definitions for KRS 278.465 to 278.468.

As used in KRS

278.465

to

278.468

:

“Eligible customer-generator” means a customer of a retail electric supplier who owns and operates an electric generating facility that is located on the customer’s premises, for the primary purpose of supplying all or part of the customer’s own electricity requirements;

“Eligible electric generating facility” means an electric generating facility that:

Is connected in parallel with the electric distribution system;

Generates electricity using:

Solar energy;

Wind energy;

Biomass or biogas energy; or

Hydro energy; and

Has a rated capacity of not greater than forty-five (45) kilowatts; and

“Kilowatt hour” means a measure of electricity defined as a unit of work of energy, measured as one (1) kilowatt of power expended for one (1) hour;

“Net metering” means the difference between the:

Dollar value of all electricity generated by an eligible customer-generator that is fed back to the electric grid over a billing period and priced as prescribed in KRS

278.466

; and

Dollar value of all electricity consumed by the eligible customer-generator over the same billing period and priced using the applicable tariff of the retail electric supplier.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 193, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 101, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

278.466.
Availability of net metering — Type, expense, and installation of meter — Compensation to eligible customer-generators for electricity fed back into grid — Commission to set compensation rate — Excess generation credits nonrefundable — Twenty-five year cap on preexisting new metering tariff provisions — Safety and power quality standards — Transferability of installation at same premises.

Each retail electric supplier shall make net metering available to any eligible customer-generator that the supplier currently serves or solicits for service. If the cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems reaches one percent (1%) of a supplier’s single hour peak load during a calendar year, the supplier shall have no further obligation to offer net metering to any new customer-generator at any subsequent time.

Each retail electric supplier serving a customer with eligible electric generating facilities shall use a standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of electricity in two (2) directions. Any additional meter, meters, or distribution upgrades needed to monitor the flow in each direction shall be installed at the customer-generator’s expense. If additional meters are installed, the net metering calculation shall yield the same result as when a single meter is used.

A retail electric supplier serving an eligible customer-generator shall compensate that customer for all electricity produced by the customer’s eligible electric generating facility that flows to the retail electric supplier, as measured by the standard kilowatt-hour metering prescribed in subsection (2) of this section. The rate to be used for such compensation shall be set by the commission using the ratemaking processes under this chapter during a proceeding initiated by a retail electric supplier or generation and transmission cooperative on behalf of one (1) or more retail electric suppliers.

Each billing period, compensation provided to an eligible customer-generator shall be in the form of a dollar-denominated bill credit. If an eligible customer-generator’s bill credit exceeds the amount to be billed to the customer in a billing period, the amount of the credit in excess of the customer’s bill shall carry forward to the customer’s next bill. Excess bill credits shall not be transferable between customers or premises. If an eligible customer-generator closes his or her account, no cash refund for accumulated credits shall be paid.

Using the ratemaking process provided by this chapter, each retail electric supplier shall be entitled to implement rates to recover from its eligible customer-generators all costs necessary to serve its eligible customer-generators, including but not limited to fixed and demand-based costs, without regard for the rate structure for customers who are not eligible customer-generators.

For an eligible electric generating facility in service prior to the effective date of the initial net metering order by the commission in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the net metering tariff provisions in place when the eligible customer-generator began taking net metering service, including the one-to-one (1:1) kilowatt-hour denominated energy credit provided for electricity fed into the grid, shall remain in effect at those premises for a twenty-five (25) year period, regardless of whether the premises are sold or conveyed during that twenty-five (25) year period. For any eligible customer-generator to whom this subsection applies, each net metering contract or tariff under which the customer takes service shall be identical, with respect to energy rates, rate structure, and monthly charges, to the contract or tariff to which the same customer would be assigned if the customer were not an eligible customer-generator.

Electric generating systems and interconnecting equipment used by eligible customer-generators shall meet all applicable safety and power quality standards established by the National Electrical Code (NEC), Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE), and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories.

An eligible customer-generator installation is transferable to other persons at the same premises upon notification to the retail electric supplier and verification that the installation is in compliance with the applicable safety and power quality standards in KRS

278.467

and in subsection (7) of this section.

Any upgrade of the interconnection between the retail electric supplier and the customer-generator that is required by commission-approved tariffs for the purpose of allowing net metering shall be made at the expense of the customer-generator.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 193, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 138, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 101, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

278.467.
Jurisdiction over disputes — Guidelines — Forms — Posting on Website.

The commission shall have original jurisdiction over any dispute between a retail electric supplier and an eligible customer-generator, regarding net metering rates, service, standards, performance of contracts, and testing of net meters.

No later than one hundred eighty (180) days from July 15, 2008, the Public Service Commission shall develop interconnection and net metering guidelines for all retail electric suppliers operating in the Commonwealth. The guidelines shall meet the requirements of KRS 278.466(7).

No later than ninety (90) days from the issuance by the Public Service Commission of the guidelines required under subsection (2) of this section, each retail electric supplier shall file with the commission a net metering tariff and application forms to comply with those guidelines. All retail electric suppliers shall make their net metering tariff and interconnection practices easily available to the public by posting the tariff and practices on their Web sites.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 138, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 101, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

278.468.
KRS 278.465 to 278.468 not applicable to certain United States agencies or instrumentalities.

Nothing in KRS

278.465

to

278.468

shall apply to a United States corporate agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or a distributor of electric power primarily supplied by such a corporate agency or instrumentality of the United States government.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.